trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="g/enel__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enel</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anet</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anan</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anez</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anomp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anit</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anont</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aner</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anen</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anes</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anemp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anec’h</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anent</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aned</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anis</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjout</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anas</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjomp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjoc’h</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjont</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjod</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anin</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ani</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ano</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>animp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anot</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>anoc’h</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anint</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anor</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfen</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfes</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfe</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfemp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfec’h</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfent</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anfed</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjen</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjes</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anje</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjemp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjec’h</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjent</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anjed</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="cip"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anet</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anomp</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anit</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anent</l>
          <r>enel<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="genel"><par n="initial-g"/><i></i><par n="g/enel__vblex"/></e>
